Florida, session 2026, SB360.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSubsection (2) of section 468.8313, Florida 19 Statutes, is amended to read: 20 468.8313âExaminations.â 21 (2)âAn applicant may practice in this state as a home 22 inspector if he or she passes the required examination, is of 23 good moral character, and completes a course of study of at 24 least 150 120 hours that covers all of the following components 25 of a home: structure, electrical system, HVAC system, roof 26 covering, plumbing system, interior components, exterior 27 components, and site conditions that affect the structure. The 28 course of study must also cover state insurance inspections, 29 wind mitigation, four-point inspections, and roof 30 certifications. A minimum of 8 hours must cover the basics of 31 the Florida Building Code and a minimum of 8 hours must cover 32 report writing, including a practical component. 33 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 468.8314, Florida 34 Statutes, is amended to read: 35 468.8314âLicensure.â 36 (3)âThe department shall certify as qualified for a license 37 by endorsement an applicant who is of good moral character as 38 determined in s. 468.8313, who maintains an insurance policies 39 policy as required by s. 468.8322, and who: 40 (a)âHolds a valid license to practice home inspection 41 services in another state or territory of the United States, 42 whose educational requirements are substantially equivalent to 43 those required by this part; and has passed a national, 44 regional, state, or territorial licensing examination that is 45 substantially equivalent to the examination required by this 46 part; or 47 (b)âHas held a valid license to practice home inspection 48 services issued by another state or territory of the United 49 States for at least 10 years before the date of application. 50 Such application must be made either when the license in another 51 state or territory is active or within 2 years after such 52 license was last active. 53 Section 3.âSubsection (1) of section 468.8316, Florida 54 Statutes, is amended to read: 55 468.8316âContinuing education.â 56 (1)âThe department may not renew a license until the 57 licensee submits proof satisfactory to the department that 58 during the 3 2 years before application for renewal the licensee 59 completed at least 20 14 hours of continuing education. Of the 60 20 14 hours, at least 4 2 hours must be in hurricane mitigation 61 training that includes hurricane mitigation techniques and 62 compliance with the uniform mitigation verification inspection 63 form developed under s. 627.711(2) and at least 2 hours must be 64 in Florida Building Code requirements. The department shall 65 adopt rules establishing criteria for approving continuing 66 education providers and courses. 67 Section 4.âSection 468.8321, Florida Statutes, is amended 68 to read: 69 468.8321âDisclosures.âBefore Prior to contracting for or 70 commencing a home inspection, a home inspector shall provide to 71 the consumer a copy of his or her license or license number to 72 practice home inspection services in this state and a written 73 disclosure that contains the scope and any exclusions of the 74 home inspection. 75 Section 5.âSection 468.8322, Florida Statutes, is amended 76 to read: 77 468.8322âInsurance.âA home inspector shall maintain a 78 commercial general liability insurance policy and an errors and 79 omissions insurance policy in an amount of not less than 80 $500,000 per policy $300,000. 81 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.